Utah statutes.
26-20-15.   Limitation of actions -- Civil acts antedating this section --
Civil burden of proof -- Estoppel -- Joint civil liability -- Venue.
(1)  An action under this chapter may not be brought after the later of:
(a)  six years after the date on which the violation was committed; or
(b)  three years after the date an official of the state charged with
responsibility to act in the circumstances discovers the violation, but in no
event more than ten years after the date on which the violation was committed.
(2)  A civil action brought under this chapter may be brought for acts
occurring prior to the effective date of this section if the limitations
period set forth in Subsection (1) has not lapsed.
(3)  In any civil action brought under this chapter the state shall be
required to prove by a preponderance of evidence, all essential elements of
the cause of action including damages.
(4)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a final judgment rendered in
favor of the state in any criminal proceeding under this chapter, whether upon
a verdict after trial or upon a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, shall estop
the defendant from denying the essential elements of the offense in any civil
action under this chapter which involves the same transaction.
(5)  Civil liability under this chapter shall be joint and several for a
violation committed by two or more persons.
(6)  Any action brought by the state under this chapter shall be brought in
district court in Salt Lake County or in any county where the defendant
resides or does business.
